Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful disclosure of private information
if:
(a) The person, with the intent to stalk or injure another person, or to cause damage to
another person’s  property, knowingly causes the other person’s personal information to be
disclosed;
(b) The person knows or  reasonably should have known that the other person did not
consent to the disclosure; and
(c) The other person is stalked or injured, or the other person’s property  is damaged, as
a result of the disclosure.
(2) Unlawful disclosure of private information is a Class B misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Disclose” includes, but is not limited to, transfer, publish, distribute,  exhibit, ad-
vertise and offer.
(b) “Injure” means to subject another to bodily injury or death.
(c) “Personal information” means:
(A) A person’s  home address, personal electronic mail address, personal phone number
or Social Security number;
(B) Contact information for a person’s employer;
(C) Contact information for a family member of a person;
(D) Photographs of a person’s child; or
(E) Identification of the school that a person’s child attends.
(d) “Stalk”  means conduct constituting the crime of stalking under ORS 163.732 or con-
duct that would give rise  to an action for issuance or violation of a stalking protective order
under ORS 30.866.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to  161.055, 161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035, 162.055  to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425,  162.465, 163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to 163.257,  163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467,  163.429, 163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
Enrolled Senate Bill 1121 (SB 1121-B) Page 1
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270, 164.305  to 164.377,
164.395 to  164.415, 164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002 to  167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to  167.252, 167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820  and section 1 of  this 2025 Act  shall be known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
SECTION 3.  Section 15, chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1)  [ Sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589  and the amendments
to ORS 180.095 by section 10 , [ of this 2023 Act ] chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative
on July 1, 2024.
(2) The amendments  to [ section 5 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 646A.578  by section 12 , [ of this 2023
Act] chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative on January 1, 2026.
(3) The amendments  to [ section 9 of this  2023 Act ] ORS 646A.589  by section 11 , [ of this 2023
Act] chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative  on [ January 1, 2026 ] the effective date
of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 646A.570 to
646A.589.
SECTION 5. (1) Before bringing an action  under ORS 646A.589 (4), the Attorney General
shall notify  a controller of a violation of ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 if the Attorney General
determines that the controller can  cure the violation. If the controller fails to cure the vio-
lation within 30 days after receiving the notice of the violation, the Attorney  General may
bring the action without further notice.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2026, subsection (1) of this section applies only  to a controller
that is a noncommercial  educational broadcast station, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 397, as in ef-
fect on the effective date of this 2025 Act, that:
(a) Receives funding from the Corporation for Public Broadcasting or is a primary entry
point, national primary or state primary, as defined in 47 C.F.R. 11.18, as in effect  on the
effective date of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Distributes the noncommercial educational broadcast station’s journalism content
without cost to recipients.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 161.005  by section 2
of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1121 (SB 1121-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1121 (SB 1121-B) Page 3